data/giellatekno/gt-norm-yamls/N-kukkw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# This gold standard is automatically generated from the Votic dictionary
# at Språkbanken (https://spraakbanken.gu.se/karp/#?mode=votiska)

Tests:
  Noun - kukkõ :   # should decline like the paradigm 'asKukkõ'
    kukkõ+N+Sg+Nom: kukkõ
    kukkõ+N+Pl+Nom: kukõd
    kukkõ+N+Sg+Gen: kuka
    kukkõ+N+Pl+Gen: [kukki, kukkije]
    kukkõ+N+Sg+Par: [kukka, kukkaa]
    kukkõ+N+Pl+Par: [kukki, kukkitõ]
    kukkõ+N+Sg+Ill: [kukkaa, kukkasõ]
    kukkõ+N+Pl+Ill: [kukki, kukkisõ]
    kukkõ+N+Sg+Ine: kukõz
    kukkõ+N+Pl+Ine: kukkiz
    kukkõ+N+Sg+Ela: kukõssõ
    kukkõ+N+Pl+Ela: kukkissõ
    kukkõ+N+Sg+All: kukõllõ
    kukkõ+N+Pl+All: kukkillõ
    kukkõ+N+Sg+Ade: kukõl
    kukkõ+N+Pl+Ade: kukkil
    kukkõ+N+Sg+Abl: kukõltõ
    kukkõ+N+Pl+Abl: kukkiltõ
    kukkõ+N+Sg+Tra: kukõssi
    kukkõ+N+Pl+Tra: kukkissi
    kukkõ+N+Sg+Ter: kukkassaa
    kukkõ+N+Pl+Ter: kukkissaa
    kukkõ+N+Sg+Com: kukaka
    kukkõ+N+Pl+Com: kukkika
